zh-TW: 支援的 M.2 磁碟長度: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; 其他
ro-RO: Lungime unitate M.2 suportată: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Altele
th: ความยาวไดรฟ์ M.2 ที่รองรับ: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Podržana duljina M.2 pogona: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Ostalo
pl: Obsługiwana długość dysku M.2: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Inne
nl: Ondersteunde M.2-schijflengte: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Andere
sl-SI: Podprta dolžina pogona M.2: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Drugo
tr: Desteklenen M.2 sürücü uzunluğu: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Diğer
sk-SK: Podporovaná dĺžka M.2 disku: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Iné
ko: 지원되는 M.2 드라이브 길이: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; 기타
ru: Поддерживаемая длина накопителя M.2: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Другой
lt-LT: Palaikomas M.2 disko ilgis: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Kita
nb: Støttet M.2-stasjonslengde: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Annet
ja: サポートされるM.2ドライブ長: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; その他
pt-PT: Comprimento de unidade M.2 suportado: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Outro
cs: Podporovaná délka disku M.2: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Jiné
el: Υποστηριζόμενο μήκος δίσκου M.2: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Άλλο
pt-BR: Comprimento de unidade M.2 suportado: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Outro
de: Unterstützte M.2-Laufwerkslänge: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Sonstiges
vi: Độ dài ổ M.2 được hỗ trợ: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Khác
sv: M.2-enhetslängd som stöds: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Övrigt
bg-BG: Поддържана дължина на M.2 диск: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Други
es: Longitud de unidad M.2 soportada: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Otros
fr: Longueur de SSD M.2 prise en charge: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Autre
hu: Támogatott M.2 meghajtó hossza: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Egyéb
da: Understøttet M.2-drevlængde: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Andet
zh-CN: 支持的 M.2 驱动器长度: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; 其他
en: M.2 drive length supported: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Other
fi: Tuettu M.2-aseman pituus: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Muu
it: Lunghezza dell'unità M.2 supportata: 22110; 2230; 2242; 2260; 2280; Altro